Maryland, session 2026, HB1419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1419*

HOUSE BILL 1419
SUBTITLE 9. CENTRALIZED BACKGROUND CHECK DIVISION.
2–901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DESIGNATED INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE OF A UNIT OF STATE
OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT RESPONSIBLE FOR ALL POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND
INVESTIGATION PROCESSES AND PROCEDURES.
(C) “DISQUALIFYING EVENT” MEANS AN EVENT, INCLUDING AN ARREST, AN
ADJUDICATION, A CONVICTION, OR A REQUIREMENT FOR REGISTRATION AS A SEX
OFFENDER, FOR WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL IS INELIGIBLE TO HOLD A REGULATED
POSITION.
(D) “DIVISION” MEANS THE CENTRALIZED BACKGROUND CHECK
DIVISION.
(E) (1) “EMPLOYEE OR SERVICE PROVIDER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
PROVIDES SERVICES TO AN EMPLOYER.
(2) “EMPLOYEE OR SERVICE PROVIDER” INCLUDES:
(I) A PAID OR UNPAID VOLUNTEER OR INTERN;
(II) A CONTRACTOR, SUBCONTRACTOR, OR VENDOR; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES GOODS OR
SERVICES TO A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT AS DETERMINED BY THE
DIVISION.
(F) “REGULATED POSITION” MEANS A POSITION AS AN EMPLOYEE OR
SERVICE PROVIDER WITHIN OR FUNDED BY A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT THAT:
(1) IS REQUIRED BY STATE OR LOCAL LAW, REGULATION, OR POLICY
TO HAVE A POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION; AND
(2) PROHIBITED ACTIVITY WOULD DISQUALIFY AN INDIVIDUAL FROM
HOLDING.
2–902.

HOUSE BILL 1419 3
(A) THERE IS A CENTRALIZED BACKGROUND CHECK DIVISION IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE DIVISION, IN COORDINATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC
SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES, IS RESPONSIBLE FOR OVERSIGHT OF
POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATIONS OF INDIVIDUALS WHO HOLD OR
HAVE BEEN SELECTED TO HOLD REGULATED POSITIONS.
(C) IN COORDINATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND
CORRECTIONAL SERVICES, THE DIVISION SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH STANDARDS AND BEST PRACTICES FOR THE
CENTRALIZATION AND EFFICIENCY OF BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION PROCESSES
STATEWIDE;
(2) WORK WITH STATE AGENCIES AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS TO
ENSURE THAT REQUIRED POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATIONS ARE
CONDUCTED FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO HOLD APPROPRIATE POSITIONS AND ROLES;
(3) ENSURE THAT ALL POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND
INVESTIGATIONS ARE ACCOMPANIED BY ENROLLMENT IN THE FEDERAL BUREAU
OF INVESTIGATION NEXT GENERATION IDENTIFICATION RAP BACK PROGRAM; AND
(4) ADOPT ANY RULE, REGULATION, AND POLICY NECESSARY TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) THERE IS AN EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DIVISION, APPOINTED BY
THE SECRETARY.
(E) THE DIVISION SHALL REQUIRE EACH UNIT OF STATE AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENT TO:
(1) APPOINT A DESIGNATED INDIVIDUAL TO OVERSEE THE
POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION PROCESS AND REPORT TO THE
DIVISION ON ALL BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION–RELATED ISSUES;
(2) NOTIFY THE DIVISION WHEN THE DESIGNATED INDIVIDUAL OR A
REGULATED POSITION HAS CHANGED; AND
(3) REQUIRE THE DESIGNATED INDIVIDUAL TO UNDERGO TRAINING
ON THE APPROPRIATE ROLE AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF A DESIGNATED INDIVIDUAL.

HOUSE BILL 1419
(F) THE DIVISION SHALL PROVIDE OR COORDINATE SUPPORT SERVICES TO
UNITS OF STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT, INCLUDING:
(1) TECHNICAL SERVICES AND SUPPORT FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION
OF RAP BACK; AND
(2) PROVIDING ADVICE ON THE PROTECTION OF ALL INDIVIDUALS,
INCLUDING MINORS, BY STRENGTHENING HIRING POLICIES AND BACKGROUND
INVESTIGATION PROCEDURES.
2–903.
FOR EACH EMPLOYEE OR SERVICE PROVIDER SUBJECT TO A
POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION FOR A REGULATED POSITION:
(1) THE DESIGNATED INDIVIDUAL FOR A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE DIVISION ALL INFORMATION REQUIRED TO
CONDUCT THE POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION; AND
(2) THE DIVISION SHALL CONDUCT A POSITION–RELATED
BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION PROMPTLY ON RECEIPT OF A REQUEST FROM A UNIT
OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
2–904.
(A) IN PERFORMING A POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE DIVISION MAY REQUEST THE ASSISTANCE, AS NEEDED,
OF THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY, THE POLICE COMMISSIONER OF BALTIMORE CITY,
THE CHIEF OF POLICE IN ANY COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAINTAINING A POLICE
FORCE, OR THE SHERIFF IN A COUNTY NOT MAINTAINING A POLICE FORCE.
(B) THE DIVISION SHALL UPDATE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
FOR A POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION UNDER THIS SECTION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS FOR THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION NEXT GENERATION IDENTIFICATION RAP BACK PROGRAM,
APPLICABLE REGULATIONS, AND OTHER REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) THE DIVISION SHALL PROMPTLY TRANSMIT THE RESULTS OF THE
POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION AND ANY SUBSEQUENT UPDATE
TO:
(1) THE UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT REQUESTED
THE POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1419 5
(2) THE INDIVIDUAL WHO IS THE SUBJECT OF THE
POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION.
(D) THE RESULTS OF, AND ANY RECORD OBTAINED THROUGH, A
POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION UNDER THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING ANY SUBSEQUENT UPDATE:
(1) ARE CONFIDENTIAL AND SHALL BE TREATED AS A PERSONNEL
RECORD;
(2) MAY NOT BE DISSEMINATED, EXCEPT AS REQUIRED BY LAW; AND
(3) MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE PURPOSES AUTHORIZED BY THIS
SUBTITLE.
(E) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS THE SUBJECT OF A POSITION–RELATED
BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY CONTEST THE RESULTS
OF AN INVESTIGATION AS PROVIDED IN § 10–223 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE
ARTICLE.
2–905.
(A) A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT PROVIDES FUNDING
FOR A REGULATED POSITION SHALL REQUIRE, AS A CONDITION OF FUNDING, THAT
THE PROGRAM OR ENTITY THAT RECEIVES THE FUNDING DISCLOSE TO THE UNIT
THE NAME AND DATE OF BIRTH OF EACH INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED OR SUPERVISED BY
THE PROGRAM OR ENTITY IF THE INDIVIDUAL HOLDS OR IS SELECTED TO HOLD A
REGULATED POSITION.
(B) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND EACH OCTOBER 1 THEREAFTER,
EACH UNIT OF STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE DIVISION
THE TOTAL NUMBER OF REGULATED POSITIONS, DISQUALIFYING EVENTS FOR EACH
POSITION, AND DATA ON THE EMPLOYEES OR SERVICE PROVIDERS DISQUALIFIED
FOR THE MOST RECENT STATE FISCAL YEAR.
(C) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE DIVISION SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION SUBMITTED TO THE DIVISION UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH UNIT OF STATE AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENT:

HOUSE BILL 1419
(1) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND
INVESTIGATIONS FOR EACH REGULATED POSITION;
(2) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF ALERTS RECEIVED THROUGH THE
FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION NEXT GENERATION IDENTIFICATION RAP
BACK PROGRAM, AND WHAT ACTION, IF ANY, WAS TAKEN; AND
(3) INFORMATION REGARDING COMPLIANCE WITH REPORTING
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
2–906.
(A) INFORMATION ACCESSED OR OBTAINED UNDER THIS SECTION IS
SUBJECT TO THE CONFIDENTIALITY REQUIREMENTS OF § 2–1240 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE ANY EMPLOYEE
OR SERVICE PROVIDER WITHIN OR FUNDED BY A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT TO UNDERGO A POSITION–RELATED BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION IF
THE EMPLOYEE OR SERVICE PROVIDER IS EMPLOYED BY OR PROVIDING SERVICES
TO A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
16–203.
(E) A PERSON THAT FAILS TO COMPLY WITH A REQUIREMENT UNDER TITLE
2, SUBTITLE 9 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE MAY BE SUBJECT TO CONTRACT
CANCELLATION OR DEBARMENT BY A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR
THE BOARD, IF APPLICABLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.